Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.176

[Art. 17] Jurisdiction of courts-martial in general.

Each force of the organized militia has court-martial jurisdiction over all persons subject to this code. The exercise of jurisdiction by one force over personnel of another force shall be in accordance with regulations prescribed by the governor.

[ 1989 c 48 s 17; 1963 c 220 s 17.]